Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Part 2. Applicability

§ 1-201.
New common interest communities.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section and sections 1-203 and 1-204 of this title, this title applies to all condominiums in this state after the effective date of this title that may be used for residential purposes and to all other common interest communities that contain 12 or more units that may be used for residential purposes and are created within this state after the effective date of this title. The provisions of 27 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 1 shall not apply to common interest communities created after December 31, 1998. Amendments to this title apply to all common interest communities that contain 12 or more units that may be used for residential purposes and are created after January 1, 2011, or are subject to this title by amendment of their declaration, regardless of when the amendment to this title is adopted in this state.

A mobile home park, as defined in 10 V.S.A. chapter 153, existing before June 30, 1990, shall not be converted through the use of any device, directly or indirectly, into a common interest community pursuant to this title. Any person who offers for transfer ownership interests in a residential condominium unit in a mobile home park shall be subject to the provisions of 27 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 3 and other applicable laws.

Common interest communities created under this title shall be subject to 27 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 2.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-202.
[Reserved.]

§ 1-203.
Exception for small projects and limited expense liability planned communities.

If a planned community:

contains no more than 24 units and is not subject to any development rights; or

provides in its declaration that the annual average common expense liability of all units restricted to residential purposes, exclusive of optional user fees and any insurance premiums paid by the association may not exceed $300.00 as adjusted pursuant to section 1-115 of this title, it is subject only to sections 1-105, 1-106, and 1-107 of this title unless the declaration provides that this entire title is applicable.

The exemption provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section applies only if:

the declarant reasonably believes in good faith that the maximum stated assessment will be sufficient to pay the expenses of the planned community; and

the declarant provides that the assessment may not be increased above the limitation in subdivision (a)(2) of this section during the period of declarant’s control without the consent of all unit owners.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-204.
Preexisting common interest communities.

Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, the following sections of this title apply to a common interest community created in this state before January 1, 1999: sections 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-103, 2-104, 2-121, 3-102(a)(1) through (6) and (11) through (16), 3-111, 3-116, 3-118, 4-109 and 4-117 to the extent necessary to construe the applicable sections. The sections described in this subdivision apply only to events and circumstances occurring after December 31, 1998 and do not invalidate existing provisions of the declarations, bylaws, plats or plans of those common interest communities.
(a) (1) Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, the following sections of this title apply to a common interest community created in this state before January 1, 1999: sections 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-103, 2-104, 2-121, 3-102(a)(1) through (6) and (11) through (16), 3-111, 3-116, 3-118, 4-109 and 4-117 to the extent necessary to construe the applicable sections. The sections described in this subdivision apply only to events and circumstances occurring after December 31, 1998 and do not invalidate existing provisions of the declarations, bylaws, plats or plans of those common interest communities.

Unless excepted under section 1-203 of this title, the following sections of this title apply to a common interest community created in this state before January 1, 1999: sections 1-206; 2-102, 2-117(h) and (i), 2-124, 3-103, 3-108, 3-110, and 3-124. The sections described in this subdivision apply only to events and circumstances occurring after December 31, 2011 and do not invalidate existing provisions of the declarations, bylaws, plats, or plans of those common interest communities.

If a planned community created within this state before the effective date of this title contains no more than 24 units and is not subject to development rights, it is subject only to sections 1-105, 1-106, and 1-107 of this title unless the declaration is amended in conformity with applicable law and with the procedures and requirements of the declaration to take advantage of the provisions of section 1-206 of this title, in which case all the sections enumerated in subsection (a) of this section apply to that planned community.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 2012;

2011, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 107, eff. March 7, 2012.

§ 1-205.
[Reserved.]

§ 1-206.
Amendments to governing instruments.

The declaration, bylaws, or plat and plans of any common interest community created before the effective date of this title may be amended to achieve any result permitted by this title, regardless of what applicable law provided before this title was enacted.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2-117(i) and (j) of this title, an amendment to the declaration, bylaws, or plats and plans authorized by this section shall be adopted in conformity with any procedures and requirements for amending the instruments specified in those instruments or, if there are none, in conformity with the amendment procedures of this title. If an amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this title, all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this title also apply to that person.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-207.
Applicability to nonresidential and mixed-use common interest communities.

[Repealed.]

A nonresidential common interest community is not subject to this title except to the extent the declaration provides that:

this entire title applies to the community;

Articles 1 and 2 of this title apply to the community; or

in the case of a planned community, only sections 1-105, 1-106, and 1-107 of this title apply to the community.

[Repealed.]

If this entire title applies to a nonresidential common interest community, the declaration may also require, subject to section 1-112 of this title, that:

notwithstanding section 3-105 of this title, any management contract, employment contract, lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities, and any other contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant continues in force after the declarant turns over control of the association; and

notwithstanding section 1-104 of this title, purchasers of units must execute proxies, powers of attorney, or similar devices in favor of the declarant regarding particular matters enumerated in those instruments.

A common interest community that contains units restricted exclusively to nonresidential purposes and other units that may be used for residential purposes is not subject to this title unless the units that may be used for residential purposes would comprise a common interest community that would be subject to this title in the absence of the nonresidential units or the declaration provides that this title applies as provided in subsection (b) or (d) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-208.
Out-of-state common interest communities.

This title does not apply to a common interest community located outside this state, but sections 4-102 and 4-103, and to the extent applicable, sections 4-104 through 4-106 of this title, apply to a contract for the disposition of a unit in a common interest community signed in this state by any party unless exempt under subsection 4-101(b) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999;

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-209.
Small condominiums; exception; access to mixed funding sources.

Subsection 2-101(b), subdivisions 2-109(b)(2) and (11), subsection 2-109(g), section 2-115, and Article 4 of this title shall not apply to a condominium if the declaration:

creates fewer than 10 units; and

restricts ownership of a unit to entities that are controlled by, affiliated with, or managed by the declarant.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 26, 2006; amended

2011, No. 52

, § 25, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 1-210.
Other exempt real estate arrangements.

An arrangement between the associations for two or more common interest communities to share the costs of real estate taxes, insurance premiums, services, maintenance or improvements of real estate, or other activities specified in their arrangement or declarations does not create a separate common interest community.

An arrangement between an association and the owner of real estate that is not part of a common interest community to share the costs of real estate taxes, insurance premiums, services, maintenance or improvements of real estate, or other activities specified in their arrangement does not create a separate common interest community. However, assessments against the units in the common interest community required by the arrangement must be included in the periodic budget for the common interest community, and the arrangement must be disclosed in all public offering statements and resale certificates required by this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 1-211.
Covenants; cost-sharing agreements.

A covenant that requires the owners of separately owned parcels of real estate to share costs or other obligations associated with a party wall, driveway, well, or other similar use does not create a common interest community unless the owners otherwise agree.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.